Massachusetts, session 194th, H4065.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 29D the following section:-
Section 29E. In court proceedings related to the removal of a child from their home for
neglect, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that neglect does not include a failure of a victim
of domestic violence to: (i) prevent a child from witnessing the domestic violence; (ii) leave the
home in which the alleged perpetrator resides; (iii) end a relationship with the alleged
perpetrator; (iv) report the domestic violence to law enforcement or the department; or (v) seek
an order of protection against the alleged perpetrator. For the purposes of this section, “domestic
violence” shall include coercive control, as defined in section 1 of chapter 209A.
SECTION 2. Said chapter 119 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 37 the
following section:-
of 2

Section 37A. (a) There shall be a rebuttable presumption in all department proceedings
that neglect of a child does not include a failure of a victim of domestic violence to: (i) prevent a
child from witnessing the domestic violence; (ii) leave the home in which the alleged perpetrator
resides; (iii) end a relationship with the alleged perpetrator; (iv) report the domestic violence to
law enforcement or the department; or (v) seek an order of protection against the alleged
perpetrator. For the purposes of this section, “domestic violence” shall include coercive control,
as defined in section 1 of chapter 209A.
(b) All employees of the department shall have mandatory training on issues related to
domestic violence.
of 2